Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Chapter 35. Mississippi Sesquicentennial of the American Civil War Commission

§ 39-35-1.
Sesquicentennial of the American Civil War Commission created; composition; terms of office; executive committee; advisory council; quorum; compensation; staff; funding; powers and duties.

The Mississippi Sesquicentennial of the American Civil War Commission (commission) is hereby established to prepare for and commemorate the Sesquicentennial, or One Hundred and Fiftieth anniversary, of Mississippi’s participation in the American Civil War (April 1861-April 1865).

The commission shall have a total membership of fifteen (15) members, or their designees, as follows: (a) the Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority; (b) the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Archives and History; (c) the State Superintendent of Public Education, or his designee; (d) the Manager of the Bureau of Film and Culture of the Mississippi Development Authority, Division of Tourism; (e) the President/Chairman of the Mississippi Historical Society; (f) the Chairman of the Mississippi Civil War Battlefield Commission; (g) the Director of the Brice’s Crossroads Battlefield Commission; (h) the Director of the Vicksburg National Military Park; (i) the Director of the Battle of Shiloh-Battle of Corinth National Military Park; (j) the Director of the Grand Gulf Military Monument; (k) a representative of the Mississippi Tourism Association; (l) the National Park Service Administrator of Ship Island/Fort Massachusetts; (m) a citizen of Mississippi appointed by the Governor; (n) a member of the Mississippi Senate appointed by the Lieutenant Governor who shall serve in an ex officio nonvoting capacity; and (o) a member of the Mississippi House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker who shall serve in an ex officio nonvoting capacity.

Ex officio members and legislative members of the commission shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. Citizen members shall serve a term of four (4) years. Appointments to fill vacancies occurring for a reason other than the expiration of a term shall be for the remainder of the unexpired terms. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments, and all members may be reappointed.

The commission shall elect a chairman and vice chairman from among its membership. The commission may name five (5) of its members to constitute an executive committee, which shall act for the commission pursuant to its direction.

The commission may appoint and establish an advisory council composed of citizens at large who have knowledge of American Civil War and Mississippi history and interest in its Sesquicentennial celebration, to assist the commission in its work.

A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum. The meetings of the commission shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever a majority of the members so request. No recommendation of the commission shall be adopted except by majority vote of the commission.

Nonlegislative members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services but may receive expense reimbursement and mileage for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided by law. Legislative members of the commission shall receive compensation applicable to committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session.

The commission shall hire an executive director, and relevant support staff, to guide and support the actions of the commission. Employment shall not extend beyond the date of expiration of the commission and shall be subject to an annual review by the executive committee of the commission.

The commission may solicit, accept, use and dispose of public or nonpublic funds, gifts, grants, donations, bequests or other funds or real or personal property for the purpose of aiding or facilitating the work of the commission. The commission may procure services, enter into contracts, leases or other legal agreements as it may deem necessary to carry out its duties as set forth in this section, but no contract or other legal agreement shall be entered into by the commission that extends beyond the date of expiration of the commission.

The commission shall have the following powers and duties:

Plan, develop and carry out educational, informational, new media/web-based programs and activities appropriate to commemorate the Sesquicentennial of the American Civil War, with emphasis on the military operations which occurred in the State of Mississippi;

Encourage interdisciplinary examination of the American Civil War;

Facilitate activities related to the American Civil War throughout Mississippi;

Encourage civic, historical, educational, economic and other organizations throughout Mississippi to organize and participate in activities to expand the understanding and appreciation of the significance of the American Civil War;

Provide technical and financial assistance to localities and nonprofit organizations to further the commemoration of the Sesquicentennial of the American Civil War;

Develop programs and facilities to ensure that the Sesquicentennial commemoration of the American Civil War results in a positive legacy and long-term public benefit;

Facilitate the development and conduct of programs designed to involve all citizens in activities that commemorate the American Civil War; and

Submit to the Legislature and the Governor an annual report for publication of the work and activity of the commission no later than the first day of each regular session of the Legislature.

The commission shall direct the Mississippi Department of Archives and History to enhance and expand Civil War markers across the state, along with all relevant educational and informational documentation necessary for the creation of a Civil War Trail, in advance of the initial celebration of the Sesquicentennial in Mississippi.

All state agencies and universities shall provide technical assistance to the commission upon request.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 507, § 4; Laws, 2015, ch. 335, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.